Washington statutes.
RCW 9.08.090

Acts against animal facilities.

A person is guilty of a class C felony: If he or she, without authorization, knowingly takes, releases, destroys, contaminates, or damages any animal or animals kept in a research or educational facility where the animal or animals are used or to be used for medical research purposes or other research purposes or for educational purposes; or if he or she, without authorization, knowingly destroys or damages any records, equipment, research product, or other thing pertaining to such animal or animals.

[ 1991 c 325 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1991 c 325: See note following RCW 9.08.080.

Civil liability for acts against animal facilities: RCW 4.24.570 through 4.24.580.